Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 4 Aid to the Disabled

49-4-80.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means a person who has applied for assistance under this article.

“Assistance” means money payments to, or hospital care in behalf of, needy individuals who are totally and permanently disabled but does not include any individual:

Who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental illness or developmental disability; or

Who has been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or being mentally ill or developmentally disabled and is a patient in a medical institution as a result thereof.

“Medical institution” means an institution that is organized to provide medical, nursing, or convalescent care.

“Public institution” means an institution that is the responsibility of a governmental unit or over which a governmental unit exercises administrative control.

“Recipient” means a person who has received assistance.

“Totally and permanently disabled” means any person not less than 18 nor more than 65 years of age who has a medically demonstrable disability which is permanent and which renders him incapable of performing any gainful occupation within his competence.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 368, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-5, 3-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-7/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (2) for the former provisions, which read: “‘Assistance’ means money payments to, or hospital care in behalf of, needy individuals who are totally and permanently disabled but does not include any such payments to or care in behalf of any such individual who is an inmate of a public institution (except as a patient in a medical institution) or any individual:”; added paragraphs (3) and (4); and redesignated former paragraphs (3) and (4) as present paragraphs (5) and (6), respectively.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

49-4-81.
Eligibility for assistance under this article.

Assistance is to be granted under this article to any person who:

Is not less than 18 nor more than 65 years of age;

Is totally and permanently disabled as that term is defined in Code Section 49-4-80;

Does not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a subsistence compatible with decency and health;

Has not made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering himself eligible for assistance under this article at any time within two years immediately prior to the filing of application for assistance pursuant to this article;

Has been a bona fide resident of the state for not less than one year; and

Is not receiving old-age assistance, aid to the blind, or aid to dependent children.

No applicant shall be required to subscribe to a pauper’s oath in order to be eligible for assistance under this article.

Inmates of any public institution meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section may be granted assistance, provided such public institution has entered into an agreement with the Department of Community Health to determine an inmate’s eligibility for assistance and services. Such agreement shall require the public institution or medical institution providing services to such inmate to provide the Department of Community Health with the required monetary payment to match the federal matching funds as set forth in federal law for the services received.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 665, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-8/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, the subsection (a) designation was added.

Law reviews.

For article, “Special Needs Trusts:
A Planning Tool with Promises,” see 16 (No. 2) Ga. St. B.J. 18 (2010).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

49-4-82.
Duties of department under this article.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration by the county departments of assistance to the needy totally and permanently disabled under this article;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this article;

Prescribe the form of and print and supply to the county department such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable; and

Publish in print or electronically an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

49-4-83.
Duties of county departments under this article.

The county departments shall:

Administer this article in their respective counties, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the board pursuant to this article;

Report to the department at such times and in such manner and form as the department may from time to time direct; and

Submit to the county commissioner or board of commissioners or the legally constituted fiscal or financial agent of the county, after approval by the department, a budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 5.

49-4-84.
Assistance is neither assignable nor subject to legal process or operation of bankruptcy law; payment of assistance check after death of recipient.

Assistance granted under this article shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity; and none of the money paid or payable under this article shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Where a recipient dies after authorization of his assistance grant but before negotiation of his assistance check for the month in which his death occurs, endorsement of such check without recourse by the department to the spouse or nearest living relative of the recipient shall be sufficient authorization to the drawee bank to pay such check.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 9.

49-4-85.
Payment of assistance after recipient moves to another county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled, with the approval of the Department of Human Services, to receive assistance in the county to which he has moved; and the county department of the county from which he has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the county department of the county to which he has moved. The county from which the recipient has moved shall pay the assistance for a period of two months, after which time the county to which he has moved shall pay the assistance, if he remains otherwise eligible.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 13; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-86.
Claims to assistance subject to amendments or repeals.

All assistance granted under this article shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing Act that may hereafter be passed; and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 16.